Utah statutes.
41-3-201.5.    Brokering of a new motor vehicle without a license prohibited.

(1) (a)  A person may not, for a fee, commission, or other form of compensation, arrange, offer to arrange, or broker a transaction involving the sale or lease of more than two:

(i)  new or used motor vehicles in any 12 consecutive month period, unless the person is licensed under Subsection 41-3-202(1); or

(ii)  used motor vehicles in any 12 consecutive month period, unless the person is licensed under Subsection 41-3-202(2).

(b)  Each transaction a person arranges, offers to arrange, or brokers involving the sale or lease of a motor vehicle for a fee, commission, or other form of compensation is a separate violation under this section if:

(i)  the person has for a fee, commission, or other form of compensation, arranged, offered to arrange, or brokered the sale or lease of more than two new or used motor vehicles within the previous 12 consecutive month period; and

(ii)  the person is not licensed under Subsection 41-3-202(1).

(2)  A person who violates this section is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

